Illinois, session 104th, HB4762.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the 5Comprehensive Licensing Information to Minimize Barriers Act. 6    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 7of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 8changing Sections 2105-5, 2105-105, 2105-131, 2105-135, 92105-165, 2105-170, 2105-205, and 2105-207 as follows: 10    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-5)  (was 20 ILCS 2105/60b)11    Sec. 2105-5. Definitions. In this Law:12    "Address of record" means the designated address recorded 13by the Department in the applicant's application file or the 14licensee's license file, as maintained by the Department's 15licensure maintenance unit. An address of record must be a 16street address, not a post office box or any other similar 17location. 18    "Applicant" means an applicant for a license, 19certification, registration, permit, or other authority issued 20or conferred by the Department by virtue or authority of which 21the licensee has or claims the right to engage in a profession, 22trade, occupation, or operation of which the Department has   HB4762 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1jurisdiction. 2    "Department" means the Division of Professional Regulation 3and the Division of Real Estate of the Department of Financial 4and Professional Regulation. Any reference in this Article to 5the "Department of Professional Regulation" shall be deemed to 6mean the "Division of Professional Regulation and the Division 7of Real Estate of the Department of Financial and Professional 8Regulation".9    "Director" means the Director of Professional Regulation 10or the Director of Real Estate.11    "Email address of record" means the designated email 12address recorded by the Department in the applicant's 13application file or the licensee's license file, as maintained 14by the Department's licensure maintenance unit. 15    "Board" means the board of persons designated for a 16profession, trade, or occupation under the provisions of any 17Act now or hereafter in force whereby the jurisdiction of that 18profession, trade, or occupation is devolved on the 19Department.20    "License" means a license, registration, certification, 21permit, or other authority purporting to be issued or 22conferred by the Department by virtue or authority of which 23the licensee has or claims the right to engage in a profession, 24trade, occupation, or operation of which the Department has 25jurisdiction.26    "Licensee" means a person who holds or claims to hold a   HB4762 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1license. An unlicensed person or entity that holds himself, 2herself, or itself out as a licensee or engages in a licensed 3activity shall be deemed to be a licensee for the purposes of 4investigation or disciplinary action. 5    "Retiree" means a person who has been duly licensed, 6registered, or certified in a profession regulated by the 7Department and who chooses to relinquish or not renew his or 8her license, registration, or certification. 9(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15; 100-262, eff. 8-22-17.) 10    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-105)  (was 20 ILCS 2105/60d)11    Sec. 2105-105. Oaths; subpoenas; penalty. 12    (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary 13in any licensing Act, the The Department, by its Director or a 14person designated by him or her, is empowered, at any time 15during the course of any investigation or hearing conducted 16pursuant to any Act administered by the Department, to 17administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, take evidence, and 18compel the production of any books, papers, records, or any 19other documents that the Director, or a person designated by 20him or her, deems relevant or material to any such 21investigation or hearing conducted by the Department, with the 22same fees and mileage and in the same manner as prescribed by 23law in judicial proceedings in civil cases in circuit courts 24of this State. Witnesses in hearings conducted under this 25Section are entitled to the same fees and mileage, and in the   HB4762 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1same manner, as prescribed by law in judicial proceedings in 2civil cases of this State. Discovery or evidence depositions 3shall not be taken, except by agreement of the Department and 4registrant. 5    (b) Any person who, without lawful authority, fails to 6appear in response to a subpoena or to answer any question or 7produce any books, papers, records, or any other documents 8relevant or material to the investigation or hearing is guilty 9of a Class A misdemeanor. Each violation shall constitute a 10separate and distinct offense.11    In addition to initiating criminal proceedings, the 12Department, through the Attorney General, may seek enforcement 13of any such subpoena by any circuit court of this State.14(Source: P.A. 99-227, eff. 8-3-15.) 15    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-131)16    Sec. 2105-131. Applicants with criminal convictions; 17notice of denial.18    (a) For the purposes of this Section, "mitigating factors" 19means any information, evidence, conduct, or circumstances 20before, during, or after the offense or offenses reviewed by 21the Department that may reflect favorably on an applicant's 22request for licensure, registration, or certification through 23the Department, such as 3 years having passed since release 24from confinement. Mitigating factors are not a bar to 25licensure, instead they provide guidance for the Department   HB4762 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1when considering licensure, registration, or certification for 2an applicant with criminal history. 3    Except as provided in Section 2105-165 of this Act 4regarding licensing restrictions based on enumerated offenses 5for health care workers as defined in the Health Care Worker 6Self-Referral Act and except as provided in any licensing Act 7administered by the Department in which convictions of certain 8enumerated offenses are a bar to licensure, the Department, 9upon a finding that an applicant for a license, certificate, 10or registration was previously convicted of a felony or 11misdemeanor that may be grounds for refusing to issue a 12license or certificate or to grant a registration, shall 13consider any mitigating factors and evidence of rehabilitation 14contained in the applicant's record, including the 15circumstances surrounding the offense or offenses and any of 16the following, to determine whether a prior conviction will 17impair the ability of the applicant to engage in the practice 18for which a license, certificate, or registration is sought:19        (1) the lack of direct relationship relation of the 20    offense for which the applicant was previously convicted 21    to the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the 22    position for which a license is sought, whether the 23    license sought offers the opportunity for the same offense 24    or a similar offense to occur, and whether the 25    circumstances leading to the conduct for which the person 26    was convicted may reoccur in the profession sought;  HB4762 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1        (2) any mitigating factors, from the point of arrest 2    or indictment when determined to be appropriate, unless 3    otherwise specified and including, but not limited to, 4    evidence of rehabilitation, the circumstances surrounding 5    the offense, the number of prior convictions that appear 6    on the conviction record, the length of time since the 7    last conviction, and whether 5 years since a felony 8    conviction or 3 years since release from confinement for 9    the conviction, whichever is later, have passed without a 10    subsequent conviction;11        (3) if the applicant was previously licensed or 12    employed in this State or other states or jurisdictions, 13    the lack of prior misconduct arising from or related to 14    the licensed position or position of employment;15        (4) the age of the person at the time of the criminal 16    offense for which the applicant was previously convicted 17    and the facts and circumstances surrounding that offense 18    and subsequent conviction;19        (4.5) the nature and severity of the prior conviction 20    and the relationship of the prior conviction to the safety 21    and security of others if, due to the applicant's criminal 22    conviction history, the applicant would be explicitly 23    prohibited by federal rules or regulations from working in 24    the position for which a license is sought; 25        (5) successful completion of sentence and, for 26    applicants serving a term of parole or probation, a   HB4762 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1    progress report provided by the applicant's probation or 2    parole officer that documents the applicant's compliance 3    with conditions of supervision;4        (6) evidence of the applicant's present fitness and 5    professional record, including the applicant's employment 6    history character;7        (7) evidence of rehabilitation or rehabilitative 8    effort during or after incarceration, or during or after a 9    term of supervision, including, but not limited to, a 10    certificate of good conduct under Section 5-5.5-25 of the 11    Unified Code of Corrections or certificate of relief from 12    disabilities under Section 5-5.5-10 of the Unified Code of 13    Corrections; and14        (8) any other mitigating factors that contribute to 15    the person's potential and current ability to perform the 16    job duties.17    (b) If the Department refuses to issue a license or 18certificate or grant registration to an applicant based upon a 19conviction or convictions, in whole or in part, the Department 20shall notify the applicant of the denial in writing with the 21following included in the notice of denial:22        (1) a statement about the decision to refuse to grant 23    a license, certificate, or registration, including an 24    explanation of how the conviction directly relates to and 25    would prevent the person from effectively engaging in the 26    position for which a license, registration, or certificate   HB4762 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1    is sought;2        (2) a list of convictions that the Department 3    determined will impair the applicant's ability to engage 4    in the position for which a license, registration, or 5    certificate is sought;6        (3) a list of convictions that formed the sole or 7    partial basis for the refusal to issue a license or 8    certificate or grant registration; and9        (4) a summary of the appeal process or the earliest 10    the applicant may reapply for a license, certificate, or 11    registration, whichever is applicable. 12    (c) The Department shall post on its website a list of all 13State licensing restrictions that would prohibit an applicant 14from working in a position for which a license is sought.15(Source: P.A. 101-388, eff. 1-1-20; 102-105, eff. 1-1-22.) 16    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-135)17    Sec. 2105-135. Qualification for licensure or 18registration; good moral character; applicant conviction 19records. 20    (a) The practice of professions licensed or registered by 21the Department is hereby declared to affect the public health, 22safety, and welfare and to be subject to regulation and 23control in the public interest. It is further declared to be a 24matter of public interest and concern that persons who are 25licensed or registered to engage in any of the professions   HB4762 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1licensed or registered by the Department perform the functions 2of those professions in a manner that does not harm or threaten 3harm to members of the public are of good moral character, 4which shall be a continuing requirement of licensure or 5registration so as to merit and receive the confidence and 6trust of the public. Upon a finding by the Department that a 7person has committed a violation of the disciplinary grounds 8of any licensing Act administered by the Department with 9regard to licenses, certificates, or authorities of persons 10exercising the respective professions, trades, or occupations, 11the Department, in addition to any remedy authorized under the 12licensing Act, is authorized to revoke, suspend, refuse to 13renew, place on probationary status, fine, or take any other 14disciplinary or nondisciplinary action it deems warranted 15against any licensee or registrant whose conduct harms or 16threatens harm to members of the public, as long as the 17Department has considered the factors set forth in subsection 18(a) of Section 2105-131 of this Act violates the continuing 19requirement of good moral character. 20    (b) No application for licensure or registration shall be 21denied by reason of a finding of lack of good moral character 22when the finding is based solely upon the fact that the 23applicant has previously been convicted of one or more 24criminal offenses. When reviewing a prior conviction of an 25initial applicant for the purpose of determining good moral 26character, the Department shall consider the factors evidence   HB4762 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1of rehabilitation and mitigating factors in the applicant's 2record, including those set forth in subsection (a) of Section 32105-131 of this Act. A denial based on a finding of an 4applicant's lack of good moral character related to a prior 5conviction shall only be permitted when required by the 6relevant professional Act and after the Department has 7considered the factors set forth in subsection (a) of Section 82105-131 of this Act. 9    (c) The Department shall not require applicants to report 10the following information and shall not consider the following 11criminal history records in connection with an application for 12licensure or registration: 13        (1) juvenile adjudications of delinquent minors as 14    defined in Section 5-105 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 15    subject to the restrictions set forth in Section 5-130 of 16    that Act;17        (2) law enforcement records, court records, and 18    conviction records of an individual who was 17 years old 19    at the time of the offense and before January 1, 2014, 20    unless the nature of the offense required the individual 21    to be tried as an adult;22        (3) records of arrest not followed by a charge or 23    conviction;24        (4) records of arrest where the charges were 25    dismissed; unless related to the practice of the 26    profession; however, applicants shall not be asked to   HB4762 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1    report any arrests, and an arrest not followed by a 2    conviction, if disclosed, shall not be the basis of a 3    denial and may be used only to assess an applicant's 4    rehabilitation; 5        (5) convictions overturned by a higher court; or6        (6) convictions or arrests that have been sealed or 7    expunged. 8(Source: P.A. 100-286, eff. 1-1-18.) 9    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-165)10    Sec. 2105-165. Health care worker licensure actions; sex 11crimes.12    (a) When a licensed health care worker, as defined in the 13Health Care Worker Self-Referral Act, (1) has been convicted 14of a criminal act that requires registration under the Sex 15Offender Registration Act; (1.5) has been convicted of 16involuntary sexual servitude of a minor under subsection (c) 17of Section 10-9 or subsection (b) of Section 10A-10 of the 18Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012; (2) has 19been convicted of a criminal battery against any patient in 20the course of patient care or treatment, including any offense 21based on sexual conduct or sexual penetration; (3) has been 22convicted of a forcible felony; or (4) is required as a part of 23a criminal sentence to register under the Sex Offender 24Registration Act, then, notwithstanding any other provision of 25law to the contrary, except as provided in this Section, the   HB4762 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1license of the health care worker shall by operation of law be 2permanently revoked without a hearing.3    (a-1) If a licensed health care worker has been convicted 4of a forcible felony, other than a forcible felony requiring 5registration under the Sex Offender Registration Act, 6involuntary sexual servitude of a minor that is a forcible 7felony, or a criminal battery against any patient in the 8course of patient care or treatment, is not required to 9register as a sex offender, and has had his or her license 10revoked pursuant to item (3) of subsection (a) of this 11Section, then the health care worker may petition the 12Department to restore his or her license if more than 5 years 13have passed since the conviction or more than 3 years have 14passed since the health care worker's release from confinement 15for that conviction, whichever is later. In determining 16whether a license shall be restored, the Department shall 17consider, but is not limited to, the following factors:18        (1) the seriousness of the offense;19        (2) the presence of multiple offenses;20        (3) prior disciplinary history, including, but not 21    limited to, actions taken by other agencies in this State 22    or by other states or jurisdictions, hospitals, health 23    care facilities, residency programs, employers, insurance 24    providers, or any of the armed forces of the United States 25    or any state;26        (4) the impact of the offense on any injured party;  HB4762 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1        (5) the vulnerability of any injured party, including, 2    but not limited to, consideration of the injured party's 3    age, disability, or mental illness;4        (6) the motive for the offense;5        (7) the lack of contrition for the offense;6        (8) the lack of cooperation with the Department or 7    other investigative authorities;8        (9) the lack of prior disciplinary action, including, 9    but not limited to, action by the Department or by other 10    agencies in this State or by other states or 11    jurisdictions, hospitals, health care facilities, 12    residency programs, employers, insurance providers, or any 13    of the armed forces of the United States or any state;14        (10) contrition for the offense;15        (11) cooperation with the Department or other 16    investigative authorities;17        (12) restitution to injured parties;18        (13) whether the misconduct was self-reported;19        (14) any voluntary remedial actions taken or other 20    evidence of rehabilitation; and 21        (15) the date of conviction. 22    (b) No person who has been convicted of any offense listed 23in subsection (a) or required to register as a sex offender may 24receive a license as a health care worker in Illinois. The 25process for petition and review by the Department provided in 26subsection (a-1) shall also apply to a person whose   HB4762 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1application for licensure is denied pursuant to item (3) of 2subsection (a) of this Section for a conviction of a forcible 3felony, other than a forcible felony requiring registration 4under the Sex Offender Registration Act, involuntary sexual 5servitude of a minor that is a forcible felony, or a criminal 6battery against any patient in the course of patient care or 7treatment, who is not required to register as a sex offender. 8    (c) Immediately after a licensed health care worker, as 9defined in the Health Care Worker Self-Referral Act, has been 10charged with any offense for which the sentence includes 11registration as a sex offender; involuntary sexual servitude 12of a minor; a criminal battery against a patient, including 13any offense based on sexual conduct or sexual penetration, in 14the course of patient care or treatment; or a forcible felony; 15then the prosecuting attorney shall provide notice to the 16Department of the health care worker's name, address, practice 17address, and license number and the patient's name and a copy 18of the criminal charges filed. Within 5 business days after 19receiving notice from the prosecuting attorney of the filing 20of criminal charges against the health care worker, the 21Secretary shall issue an administrative order that the health 22care worker shall immediately practice only with a chaperone 23during all patient encounters pending the outcome of the 24criminal proceedings. The chaperone must be a licensed health 25care worker. The chaperone shall provide written notice to all 26of the health care worker's patients explaining the   HB4762 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1Department's order to use a chaperone. Each patient shall sign 2an acknowledgement that they received the notice. The notice 3to the patient of criminal charges shall include, in 14-point 4font, the following statement: "The health care worker is 5presumed innocent until proven guilty of the charges.". The 6licensed health care worker shall provide a written plan of 7compliance with the administrative order that is acceptable to 8the Department within 5 days after service receipt of the 9administrative order. Failure to comply with the 10administrative order, failure to file a compliance plan, or 11failure to follow the compliance plan shall subject the health 12care worker to temporary suspension of his or her professional 13license until the completion of the criminal proceedings.14    (d) Nothing contained in this Section shall act in any way 15to waive or modify the confidentiality of information provided 16by the prosecuting attorney to the extent provided by law. Any 17information reported or disclosed shall be kept for the 18confidential use of the Secretary, Department attorneys, the 19investigative staff, and authorized clerical staff and shall 20be afforded the same status as is provided information under 21Part 21 of Article VIII of the Code of Civil Procedure, except 22that the Department may disclose information and documents to 23(1) a federal, State, or local law enforcement agency pursuant 24to a subpoena in an ongoing criminal investigation or (2) an 25appropriate licensing authority of another state or 26jurisdiction pursuant to an official request made by that   HB4762 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1authority. Any information and documents disclosed to a 2federal, State, or local law enforcement agency may be used by 3that agency only for the investigation and prosecution of a 4criminal offense. Any information or documents disclosed by 5the Department to a professional licensing authority of 6another state or jurisdiction may only be used by that 7authority for investigations and disciplinary proceedings with 8regards to a professional license.9    (e) Any licensee whose license was revoked or who received 10an administrative order under this Section shall have the 11revocation or administrative order vacated and completely 12removed from the licensee's records and public view and the 13revocation or administrative order shall be afforded the same 14status as is provided information under Part 21 of Article 15VIII of the Code of Civil Procedure if (1) the charges upon 16which the revocation or administrative order is based are 17dropped; (2) the licensee is not convicted of the charges upon 18which the revocation or administrative order is based; or (3) 19any conviction for charges upon which the revocation or 20administrative order was based have been vacated, overturned, 21or reversed. 22    (f) Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit the 23Department from initiating or maintaining a disciplinary 24action against a licensee independent from any criminal 25charges, conviction, or sex offender registration. 26    (g) The Department may adopt rules necessary to implement   HB4762 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1this Section. 2    (h) For the purposes of this Section, "conviction" 3includes a plea of guilty, a plea of nolo contendere, a finding 4of guilt, a jury verdict, and an entry of judgment or 5sentencing, including, but not limited to, preceding sentences 6of supervision, conditional discharge, or first offender 7probation. 8(Source: P.A. 99-886, eff. 1-1-17; 100-262, eff. 8-22-17.) 9    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-170)10    Sec. 2105-170. Health care workers; automatic suspension 11of license or registration. A health care worker, as defined 12by the Health Care Worker Self-Referral Act or as set forth by 13rule, licensed or registered by the Department shall be 14automatically and indefinitely suspended if the licensee has 15either been convicted of or has entered a plea of guilty or 16nolo contendere in a criminal prosecution to a criminal health 17care fraud offense or a criminal insurance fraud offense 18requiring intent under the laws of the State, the laws of any 19other state, or the laws of the United States of America, 20including, but not limited to, criminal Medicare or Medicaid 21fraud. A certified copy of the conviction or judgment shall be 22the basis for the suspension. If, after the issuance of the 23Department's order to suspend, a licensee requests a hearing, 24then the sole purpose of the hearing shall be limited to the 25length of the suspension of the licensee's license, as the   HB4762 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1conviction or judgment is a matter of record and may not be 2challenged.3(Source: P.A. 99-211, eff. 1-1-16; 100-262, eff. 8-22-17.) 4    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-205)  (was 20 ILCS 2105/60.3)5    Sec. 2105-205. Publication of disciplinary actions; annual 6report. 7    (a) The Department shall publish on its website, at least 8monthly, final disciplinary actions taken by the Department 9against a licensee or applicant pursuant to any licensing Act 10administered by the Department. The specific disciplinary 11action and the name of the applicant or licensee shall be 12listed.13    (b) No later than May 1 of each year, the Department must 14prepare, publicly announce, and publish a report of summary 15statistical information relating to new license, 16certification, or registration applications during the 17preceding calendar year. Each report shall show at minimum:18        (1) the number of applicants for each new license, 19    certificate, or registration administered by the 20    Department in the previous calendar year;21        (2) the number of applicants for a new license, 22    certificate, or registration within the previous calendar 23    year who had any criminal conviction;24        (3) the number of applicants for a new license, 25    certificate, or registration in the previous calendar year   HB4762 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1    who were granted a license, registration, or certificate;2        (4) the number of applicants for a new license, 3    certificate, or registration within the previous calendar 4    year with a criminal conviction who were granted a 5    license, certificate, or registration in the previous 6    calendar year;7        (5) the number of applicants for a new license, 8    certificate, or registration in the previous calendar year 9    who were denied a license, registration, or certificate;10        (6) the number of applicants for new license, 11    certificate, or registration in the previous calendar year 12    with a criminal conviction who were denied a license, 13    certificate, or registration in part or in whole because 14    of such conviction, including the types of criminal 15    convictions;16        (7) the number of licenses issued on probation within 17    the previous calendar year to applicants with a criminal 18    conviction; and19        (8) the number of licensees or certificate holders 20    whose records who were granted expungement for a record of 21    discipline with the Department were sealed based on a 22    conviction predating licensure, certification, or 23    registration or a criminal charge, arrest, or a conviction 24    that was dismissed, sealed, or expunged or did not arise 25    from the regulated activity, as a share of the total such 26    expungement requests to seal.  HB4762 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1(Source: P.A. 102-105, eff. 1-1-22.) 2    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-207)3    Sec. 2105-207. Records of Department actions; sealing of 4disciplinary records.5    (a) Any licensee subject to a licensing Act administered 6by the Department and who has been subject to disciplinary 7action by the Department may file an application with the 8Department on forms provided by the Department, along with the 9required fee of $175, to have the records classified as 10confidential, not for public release, and considered sealed 11expunged for reporting purposes if:12        (1) the application is submitted more than 3 years 13    after the disciplinary offense or offenses occurred or 14    after restoration of the license, whichever is later;15        (2) the licensee has had no incidents of discipline 16    under the licensing Act since the disciplinary offense or 17    offenses identified in the application occurred;18        (3) the Department has no pending investigations 19    against the licensee; and20        (4) the licensee is not currently in a disciplinary 21    status.22    (b) An application to make disciplinary records 23confidential shall only be considered by the Department for an 24offense or action relating to:25        (1) failure to pay taxes;  HB4762 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1        (2) continuing education;2        (3) failure to renew a license on time;3        (4) failure to obtain or renew a certificate of 4    registration or ancillary license;5        (5) advertising;6        (5.1) discipline based on criminal charges or 7    convictions: 8            (A) that did not arise from the licensed activity 9        and was unrelated to the licensed activity; or 10            (B) that were dismissed or for which records have 11        been sealed or expunged;12        (5.2) past probationary status of a license issued to 13    new applicants on the sole or partial basis of prior 14    convictions; 15        (6) any grounds for discipline removed from the 16    licensing Act;17        (7) failure to comply with workers' compensation 18    requirements; or 19        (8) reprimand of a licensee. 20    (c) An application shall be submitted to and considered by 21the Director upon submission of an application and the 22required non-refundable fee. The Department may establish 23additional requirements by rule. The Department is not 24required to report the removal of any disciplinary record to 25any national database. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit 26the Department from using a previous discipline for any   HB4762 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1regulatory purpose or from releasing records of a previous 2discipline upon request from law enforcement, or other 3governmental body as permitted by law. Classification of 4records as confidential shall result in removal of records of 5discipline from records kept pursuant to Sections 2105-200 and 62105-205 of this Act. 7    (d) Any applicant for licensure or a licensee whose 8petition for review is granted by the Department pursuant to 9subsection (a-1) of Section 2105-165 of this Law may file an 10application with the Department on forms provided by the 11Department to have records relating to his or her permanent 12denial or permanent revocation classified as confidential and 13not for public release and considered sealed expunged for 14reporting purposes in the same manner and under the same terms 15as is provided in this Section for the offenses listed in 16subsection (b) of this Section, except that the requirements 17of a 3-year waiting period and the $175 application fee do not 18apply.19    (e) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, 20and unless otherwise required by law, the Department shall 21classify disciplinary records as confidential and remove final 22disciplinary actions from public record without application 23when:24        (1) 5 years or more have lapsed since the later of: (A) 25    entry of a final disciplinary order against the applicant 26    or licensee or (B) restoration of the license after the   HB4762 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1    order;2        (2) the licensee is not in disciplinary or 3    probationary status, and there is no pending investigation 4    against the licensee; and5        (3) there have been no other incidents of discipline 6    under any licensing Act regulated by the Department since 7    the public discipline subject to review was entered or the 8    license was restored.9    The disciplinary offense or offenses that qualify under 10this subsection (e) do not include violations based on:11        (A) convictions of health care workers for the 12    offenses enumerated in Section 2105-165 unless a petition 13    for review was granted pursuant to subsection (a-1) of 14    Section 2105-165;15        (B) forcible felony convictions as listed by the 16    Criminal Code of 2012 or an equivalent law in any other 17    jurisdiction, including under federal law;18        (C) criminal acts that require registration under the 19    Sex Offender Registration Act or sexual misconduct that is 20    a violation of the Department's professional Acts;21        (D) convictions of massage therapists for the offenses 22    specified in subsections (c) and (c-5) of Section 45 of 23    the Massage Therapy Practice Act; or24        (E) felony convictions related to fraudulent activity, 25    including, but not limited to, forgery, embezzlement, 26    falsifying documentation, and defrauding the government.  HB4762 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1    If a disciplinary order consists of any of the convictions 2that do not qualify under this subsection (e), even in part, 3the disciplinary action shall not qualify for sealing under 4this subsection (e). The Department shall have up to 3 years 5after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 6General Assembly to fully implement the process of sealing 7records as provided in this subsection (e), subject to the 8availability of funds for the costs of programming and 9personnel required for the Department's implementation and the 10expenditure of Department resources.11    (f) The Department may adopt additional requirements by 12rule. The Department is not required to report the removal of 13any disciplinary record from public record to any national 14database. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the 15Department from using a previous discipline for any regulatory 16purpose, such as a factor in aggravation, in any future 17disciplinary proceeding. The Department shall not be 18prohibited from releasing records of a previous discipline 19upon request by law enforcement or other governmental bodies 20as permitted by law. Classification of records as confidential 21shall result in removal of records of discipline from records 22kept pursuant to Sections 2105-200 and 2105-205 of this Act. 23(Source: P.A. 103-26, eff. 1-1-24.) 24    Section 15. The Health Care Professional Credentials Data 25Collection Act is amended by changing Section 51 as follows:   HB4762 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1    (410 ILCS 517/51)2    Sec. 51. Licensure records. Licensure records designated 3confidential and considered sealed expunged for reporting 4purposes by the licensee under Section 2105-207 of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois are not reportable under this 6Act. 7(Source: P.A. 98-816, eff. 8-1-14; 99-78, eff. 7-20-15.) 8    Section 20. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 9changing Sections 5-5-5 and 5-5.5-25 as follows: 10    (730 ILCS 5/5-5-5)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1005-5-5)11    Sec. 5-5-5. Loss and restoration of rights. 12    (a) Conviction and disposition shall not entail the loss 13by the defendant of any civil rights, except under this 14Section and Sections 29-6 and 29-10 of The Election Code, as 15now or hereafter amended.16    (b) A person convicted of a felony shall be ineligible to 17hold an office created by the Constitution of this State until 18the completion of his sentence.19    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person 20convicted of a felony, bribery, perjury, or other infamous 21crime for an offense committed on or after the effective date 22of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly and 23committed while he or she was serving as a public official in   HB4762 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1this State is ineligible to hold any local public office or any 2office created by the Constitution of this State unless the 3person's conviction is reversed, the person is again restored 4to such rights by the terms of a pardon for the offense, the 5person has received a restoration of rights by the Governor, 6or the person's rights are otherwise restored by law.7    (c) A person sentenced to imprisonment shall lose his 8right to vote until released from imprisonment.9    (d) (Blank). On completion of sentence of imprisonment or 10upon discharge from probation, conditional discharge or 11periodic imprisonment, or at any time thereafter, all license 12rights and privileges granted under the authority of this 13State which have been revoked or suspended because of 14conviction of an offense shall be restored unless the 15authority having jurisdiction of such license rights finds 16after investigation and hearing that restoration is not in the 17public interest. This paragraph (d) shall not apply to the 18suspension or revocation of a license to operate a motor 19vehicle under the Illinois Vehicle Code.20    (e) Upon a person's discharge from incarceration or 21parole, or upon a person's discharge from probation or at any 22time thereafter, the committing court may enter an order 23certifying that the sentence has been satisfactorily completed 24when the court believes it would assist in the rehabilitation 25of the person and be consistent with the public welfare. Such 26order may be entered upon the motion of the defendant or the   HB4762 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1State or upon the court's own motion.2    (f) Upon entry of the order, the court shall issue to the 3person in whose favor the order has been entered a certificate 4stating that his behavior after conviction has warranted the 5issuance of the order.6    (g) This Section shall not affect the right of a defendant 7to collaterally attack his conviction or to rely on it in bar 8of subsequent proceedings for the same offense.9    (h) No application for any license specified in subsection 10(i) of this Section granted under the authority of this State 11shall be denied to denied by reason of an eligible offender who 12has obtained a certificate of relief from disabilities, as 13defined in Article 5.5 of this Chapter, having been previously 14convicted of one or more criminal offenses, or by reason of a 15finding of lack of "good moral character" when the finding is 16solely based upon the fact that the applicant has previously 17been convicted of one or more criminal offenses, unless:18        (1) there is a direct relationship between one or more 19    of the previous criminal offenses and the specific license 20    sought; or21        (2) the issuance of the license would involve an 22    unreasonable risk to public safety and to the practice of 23    the applicable profession; and property or to the safety 24    or welfare of specific individuals or the general public.25        (3) the applicant meets any other limitations or 26    factors detailed in the applicable professional Act.   HB4762 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1    In making such a determination, the licensing agency, in 2addition to its own requirements, may shall consider the 3following factors:4        (1) the public policy of this State, as expressed in 5    Article 5.5 of this Chapter, to encourage the licensure 6    and employment of persons previously convicted of one or 7    more criminal offenses;8        (2) the specific duties and responsibilities 9    necessarily related to the license being sought;10        (3) the bearing, if any, the criminal offenses or 11    offenses for which the person was previously convicted 12    will have on his or her fitness or ability to perform one 13    or more such duties and responsibilities;14        (4) the time which has elapsed since the occurrence of 15    the criminal offense or offenses;16        (5) the age of the person at the time of occurrence of 17    the criminal offense or offenses;18        (6) the seriousness of the offense or offenses;19        (7) any information produced by the person or produced 20    on his or her behalf in regard to his or her rehabilitation 21    and good conduct, including a certificate of relief from 22    disabilities issued to the applicant, which certificate 23    shall create a presumption of rehabilitation in regard to 24    the offense or offenses specified in the certificate; and25        (8) the legitimate interest of the licensing agency in 26    protecting property, and the safety and welfare of   HB4762 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1    specific individuals or the general public.2    (i) A certificate of relief from disabilities shall be 3issued only for a license or certification issued under the 4following Acts, as well as all professional Acts regulated by 5the Division of Professional Regulation and the Division of 6Real Estate of the Department of Financial and Professional 7Regulation:8        (1) the Animal Welfare Act; except that a certificate 9    of relief from disabilities may not be granted to provide 10    for the issuance or restoration of a license under the 11    Animal Welfare Act for any person convicted of violating 12    Section 3, 3.01, 3.02, 3.03, 3.03-1, or 4.01 of the Humane 13    Care for Animals Act or Section 26-5 or 48-1 of the 14    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;15        (2) the Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act;16        (3) the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, Hair Braiding, 17    and Nail Technology Act of 1985;18        (4) the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Repairer Regulation 19    Act;20        (5) the Boxing and Full-contact Martial Arts Act;21        (6) the Illinois Certified Shorthand Reporters Act of 22    1984;23        (7) the Illinois Farm Labor Contractor Certification 24    Act;25        (8) the Registered Interior Designers Act;26        (9) the Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of   HB4762 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1    1989;2        (10) the Landscape Architecture Registration Act;3        (11) the Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act;4        (12) the Private Employment Agency Act;5        (13) the Professional Counselor and Clinical 6    Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act;7        (14) the Real Estate License Act of 2000;8        (15) the Illinois Roofing Industry Licensing Act;9        (16) the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 10    1989;11        (17) the Water Well and Pump Installation Contractor's 12    License Act;13        (18) the Electrologist Licensing Act; 14        (19) the Auction License Act;15        (20) the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989;16        (21) the Dietitian Nutritionist Practice Act;17        (22) the Environmental Health Practitioner Licensing 18    Act;19        (23) the Funeral Directors and Embalmers Licensing 20    Code;21        (24) (blank);22        (25) the Professional Geologist Licensing Act;23        (26) the Illinois Public Accounting Act; and24        (27) the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989.25    Failure to obtain a certificate of relief from 26disabilities shall not be the sole reason for denial of a   HB4762 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1license specified in this subsection. 2(Source: P.A. 102-284, eff. 8-6-21; 103-562, eff. 11-17-23.) 3    (730 ILCS 5/5-5.5-25)4    Sec. 5-5.5-25. Certificate of good conduct. 5    (a) A certificate of good conduct may be granted as 6provided in this Section to relieve an eligible offender of 7any employment, occupational licensing, or housing bar. The 8certificate may be limited to one or more disabilities or bars 9or may relieve the individual of all disabilities and bars.10    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a certificate 11of good conduct does not relieve an offender of any 12employment-related disability imposed by law by reason of his 13or her conviction of a crime that would prevent his or her 14employment by the Department of Corrections, Department of 15Juvenile Justice, or any other law enforcement agency in the 16State. 17    (a-6) A certificate of good conduct may be granted as 18provided in this Section to an eligible offender as defined in 19Section 5-5.5-5 of this Code who has demonstrated by clear and 20convincing evidence that he or she has been a law-abiding 21citizen and is fully rehabilitated. 22    (b)(i) A certificate of good conduct may not, however, in 23any way prevent any judicial proceeding, administrative, 24licensing, or other body, board, or authority from considering 25the conviction specified in the certificate.   HB4762 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1    (ii) A certificate of good conduct shall not limit or 2prevent the introduction of evidence of a prior conviction for 3purposes of impeachment of a witness in a judicial or other 4proceeding where otherwise authorized by the applicable rules 5of evidence.6    (iii) A certificate of good conduct does not limit any 7employer, landlord, judicial proceeding, administrative, 8licensing, or other body, board, or authority from accessing 9criminal background information; nor does it hide, alter, or 10expunge the record. 11    (c) An employer is not civilly or criminally liable for an 12act or omission by an employee who has been issued a 13certificate of good conduct, except for a willful or wanton 14act by the employer in hiring the employee who has been issued 15a certificate of good conduct. 16    (d) The existence of a certificate of good conduct does 17not preclude a landlord or an administrative, licensing, or 18other body, board, or authority from retaining full discretion 19to grant or deny the application for housing or licensure. 20(Source: P.A. 101-154, eff. 1-1-20.) 21    (730 ILCS 5/5-5.5-50 rep.)22    Section 25. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 23repealing Section 5-5.5-50. 24    Section 95. Report. Nothing in this Act shall be construed   HB4762 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1to eliminate the reporting requirements pursuant to Section 22105-205 of the Department of Professional Regulation Law of 3the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 4    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 5severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.  HB4762 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 17958 AAS 31395 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 2105/2105-5was 20 ILCS 2105/60b4    20 ILCS 2105/2105-105was 20 ILCS 2105/60d5    20 ILCS 2105/2105-1316    20 ILCS 2105/2105-1357    20 ILCS 2105/2105-1658    20 ILCS 2105/2105-1709    20 ILCS 2105/2105-205was 20 ILCS 2105/60.310    20 ILCS 2105/2105-20711    225 ILCS 410/1-7from Ch. 111, par. 1701-712    410 ILCS 517/5113    730 ILCS 5/5-5-5from Ch. 38, par. 1005-5-514    730 ILCS 5/5-5.5-2515    730 ILCS 5/5-5.5-50 rep.